Arkansas statutes. Constitution Of The State Of Arkansas Of 1874
AMEND. 99.
[VOTER IDENTIFICATION] (CONST., ART. 3, §
1, AMENDED).

Publisher's Notes.

This amendment amended Ark. Const., Art. 3, §
1 and is incorporated within that section. The amendment was proposed by H.J.R. 1016 during the 2017 Regular Session and adopted at the 2018 general election by a vote of 689,454 for and 177,815 against. The amendment was effective thirty days after the election pursuant to § 7-9-119.

The bracketed heading was added by the Publisher.